District of Columbia statutes.
34-1251.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment Amendment Act of 2015.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 101
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2072(a), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment Amendment Act of 2015” for “Cable Television Reform Act of 2002.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2072(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).